Utah statutes.
16-16-602.   Patron and investor members' interests.

(1)  Unless the organic rules establish investor members' interests, a member's interest is a patron member's interest.

(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, while a person is a member of the association, the person:

(a)  if admitted as a patron member, remains a patron member;

(b)  if admitted as an investor member, remains an investor member; and

(c)  if admitted as a patron member and investor member, remains a patron and investor member if not dissociated in one of the capacities.

